Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 3
LIFELONG COLORADO INITIATIVE

26-11-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Executive committee" means the executive committee elected by the commission in accordance with section 26-11-102.

"Lifelong Colorado initiative" means the lifelong Colorado initiative created in section 26-11-302 to lead the development and implementation of state, regional, and local strategies that support aging and assist older Coloradans to lead independent, meaningful, and dignified lives in age-appropriate and affordable housing within their communities.

"State office" means the state office on aging within the department of human services created in section 26-11-202.

"Strategic action plan on aging" means the strategic action plan on aging developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to June 30, 2022.

"Technical advisory committee" means the technical advisory committee convened in the state office pursuant to section 26-11-203.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 204, § 8, effective March 24; (4) amended, (HB 22-1209), ch. 95, p. 455, § 7, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

Section 8(2) of chapter 95 (HB 22-1209), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1035 (chapter 38) becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1035 or HB 22-1209, whichever is later. HB 22-1035 became law and took effect March 24, 2022, and HB 22-1209 took effect April 12, 2022.

26-11-302. Lifelong Colorado initiative - created - reporting.

There is created the lifelong Colorado initiative within the state office. The purpose of the lifelong Colorado initiative is to:

Represent state, regional, and local strategies that support aging and assist older Coloradans to lead independent, meaningful, and dignified lives in their own homes and communities;

Represent the continued goals, priorities, and strategies aligned with the strategic action plan on aging and other strategies developed through ongoing work in the public, private, and nonprofit sectors that support older Coloradans;

Lead the development of age-friendly, livable communities; and

Align the state department's policy development and implementation through a demographic lens that supports aging across an individual's life.

Pursuant to section 26-11-203 (1)(k), the state office shall convene the technical advisory committee no later than September 1, 2022, and meet at least quarterly. The duties of the technical advisory committee include, but are not limited to:

Identifying state department priorities that overlap with the goals and strategies provided in the strategic action plan on aging and recommendations the commission makes as set forth in section 26-11-105;

Coordinating with respective state agencies and stakeholders to initiate policy development and implementation of appropriate strategies;

Developing trackable goals and metrics for strategies and programs and reporting on progress, which must be made publicly available pursuant to section 26-11-203 (1)(l); and

Supporting the state office and commission with reporting requirements and tracking implementation and progress of the goals and strategies provided in the strategic action plan on aging and recommendations the commission makes as set forth in section 26-11-105.

The technical advisory committee, in coordination with respective state agencies and the commission, shall identify appropriate policy staff within the governor's office for ongoing coordination and reporting needs.

The state office, in collaboration with the commission and technical advisory committee, shall coordinate with the state department to include in its report to the committees of reference, pursuant to the "Smart Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203, information from the state office regarding the progress and barriers specific to the implementation of the strategic action plan on aging.

The state office, the technical advisory committee, the executive committee, and the state department liaison appointed pursuant to section 26-11-104 shall meet quarterly to ensure that the perspectives of older Coloradans and the state's perspective remain aligned to coordinate progress in the development of state programs and policy.

Source:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 205, § 8, effective March 24.